Arkansas, session 2025, SB60.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 1, Subchapter 6, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-1-607. Operation of digital asset mining business within thirty-
mile radius of military facility prohibited — Definition.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Military facility" means the:
(A) Little Rock Air Force Base;
(B) Camp Joseph T. Robinson Maneuver Training Center;
(C) Ebbing Air National Guard Base;
(D) Fort Chaffee Joint Maneuver Training Center; and
(E) Pine Bluff Arsenal; and
(B) Includes without limitation a military:
(i) Base or camp;
*LJH029*
01-29-2025 15:42:50 LJH029

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 SB60
(ii) Hospital or clinic; and
(iii) Arsenal; and
(2) "Operation" means generating income as a result of
generating digital assets by securing a blockchain network.
(b) Unless the digital asset mining business was issued a permit by
the Oil and Gas Commission on or before December 31, 2024, a digital asset
mining business shall:
(1) Not operate within a thirty-mile radius of a military
facility; and
(2) Cease construction of a location that is within a thirty-
mile radius of a military facility.
(c) Upon request of a person or upon receipt of information that leads
the Attorney General to believe that a violation of this section may exist,
the Attorney General may conduct an investigation that includes without
limitation:
(1) Receiving sworn statements; and
(2) Issuing subpoenas to compel the:
(A) Testimony of witnesses subpoenaed before him or her;
and
(B) Production of records and other documents under § 25-
16-705.
(d) If as a result of an investigation under subsection (c) of this
section the Attorney General concludes that a violation of this section has
occurred, the Attorney General shall order the digital asset mining business
to shut down operations at each location that is within a thirty-mile radius
of a military facility.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Applicability.
(a) The Oil and Gas Commission shall not issue a permit to a digital
asset mining business that plans to operate at a location within a thirty-
mile radius of a military facility on or after the effective date of this
act.
(b) If the commission has already issued a permit to a digital asset
mining business that has a location that is within a thirty-mile radius of a
military facility before the effective date of this act, the commission shall
revoke the permit unless the digital asset mining facility shuts down
01-29-2025 15:42:50 LJH029

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 SB60
operations or construction at the location that is within a thirty-mile
radius of a military facility.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that digital asset mining, also
known as "cryptomining", is a rising industry in the state that poses unique
opportunities as well as risks; that risks posed by digital asset mining
include without limitation threats to national security and the security of
the State of Arkansas; that threats to national security and the security of
the State of Arkansas are amplified by a digital asset mining facility's
being located within a thirty-mile radius of a military facility; that there
are military facilities located in many different areas of the State of
Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to ensure the
health and safety of the State of Arkansas and its citizens. Therefore, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for
the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become
effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Hill











01-29-2025 15:42:50 LJH029